Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Officer Certification and Training
15.3973.
Revocation of court security officer certification.

The certification of a court security officer may, after a hearing held in conformity with KRS Chapter 13B, be revoked by the council for one (1) or more of the following reasons:

Failure to meet or maintain training requirements;

Willful falsification of information to obtain or maintain certified status;

Certification was the result of an administrative error;

Plea of guilty to, conviction of, or entering of an Alford plea to any felony;

Prohibition by federal or state law from possessing a firearm; or

Receipt of a dishonorable discharge, a bad conduct discharge, or general discharge under other than honorable conditions from any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 54, § 2, effective June 26, 2007.

15.3975.
Training requirements for employment — Biennial in-service training — Extension — Loss of status upon failure to complete training — Regaining certification.

A court security officer employed or appointed after June 26, 2007, shall satisfy the basic training requirements for employment if he or she successfully completes law enforcement training developed and approved by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council and the Administrative Office of the Courts of at least eighty (80) hours.

A court security officer employed or appointed after June 26, 2007, shall successfully complete forty (40) hours of biennial in-service training that has been certified or recognized by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council, and that is appropriate to the officer’s responsibilities.

In the event of extenuating circumstances beyond the control of a certified court security officer that prevent the officer from completing the basic or in-service training within the time specified in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the commissioner of the department or his or her designee may grant the officer an extension of time, not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days in which to complete the training.

Any court security officer who fails to successfully complete basic training within the specified time periods, including extensions, shall lose his or her court security powers and his or her precertification status shall lapse. Any court security officer who fails to successfully complete in-service training within the specified time periods, including extensions, shall lose his or her court security powers and his or her certification status shall be changed to training deficiency status. When a court security officer is deficient in required training, the commissioner of the department or his or her designee shall notify the council, which shall notify the court security officer and his or her agency.

A certified court security officer who has lost his or her court security powers due solely to his or her failure to meet the in-service training requirements of this section may regain his or her certification status and court security powers upon successful completion of the training deficiency.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 54, § 3, effective June 26, 2007.

15.3977.
Certification categories for court security officers.

The following certification categories shall exist for certified court security officers:

“Precertification status” means that the certified court security officer is currently employed or appointed by an agency and meets or exceeds all those minimum qualifications set forth in KRS

15.3971

, but has not successfully completed the training course provided in subsection KRS 15.3975(1). Upon the council’s verification that the minimum qualifications have been met, the officer shall have court security officer powers as authorized under the statute under which he or she was appointed or employed. If an officer fails to successfully complete the training course provided in subsection KRS 15.3975(1) within one (1) year of employment, his or her court security powers shall automatically terminate;

“Certification status” means that unless the certification is in revoked status or inactive status, the certified court security officer is currently employed or appointed by an agency and has met all training requirements. The officer shall have court security officer powers as authorized under the statute under which he or she was appointed or employed;

“Inactive status” means that unless the certification is in revoked status:

The person has been separated on or after December 1, 1998, from the agency by which he or she was employed or appointed and has no peace officer or court security officer powers; or

The person is on military active duty for a period exceeding three hundred sixty-five (365) days.

The person may remain on inactive status. A person who is on inactive status and who returns to a court security officer position shall have certification status restored if he or she has successfully completed the training course under subsection KRS 15.3975(1), has not committed an act for which his or her certified status may be revoked pursuant to KRS

15.3973

, and successfully completes an in-service training course as prescribed in an administrative regulation promulgated by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council.

A person returning from inactive to active certification as a court security officer after June 26, 2007, under KRS

15.380

to

15.404

shall meet the following minimum qualifications:

Be a citizen of the United States;

Possess a valid license to operate a motor vehicle;

Be fingerprinted for a criminal background check;

Not have been convicted of any felony;

Not be prohibited by federal or state law from possessing a firearm;

Have received and read the Kentucky Law Enforcement Officers Code of Ethics as established by the council;

Have not received a dishonorable discharge, bad conduct discharge, or general discharge under other than honorable conditions, if having served in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States;

Have been interviewed by the employing agency; and

Not have had certification as a peace officer permanently revoked in another state;

“Training deficiency status” means that unless the certification is in revoked status or inactive status, the certified court security officer is currently employed or appointed by an agency and has failed to meet all in-service training requirements. The officer’s court security powers shall automatically terminate, and he or she shall not exercise court security officer powers in the Commonwealth until he or she has corrected the in-service training deficiency;

“Revoked status” means that the court security officer has no court security powers and his or her certification has been revoked by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council for any one (1) of the following reasons:

Failure to meet or maintain training requirements;

Willful falsification of information to obtain or maintain certified status;

Certification was the result of an administrative error;

Plea of guilty to, conviction of, or entering of an Alford plea to any felony;

Prohibition by federal or state law from possessing a firearm; or

Receipt of a dishonorable discharge, a bad conduct discharge, or general discharge under other than honorable conditions from any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States; and

“Denied status” means that a person does not meet the requirements to achieve precertification status or certification status as a court security officer.

The design of a certificate may be changed periodically. When a new certificate is produced, it shall be distributed free of charge to each currently certified court security officer.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 54, § 4, effective June 26, 2007.

15.3979.
Court security officer not considered hazardous duty position — Ineligibility for Kentucky Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund.

Except for persons currently employed in a hazardous duty position and who remain in that hazardous duty position while performing certified court security officer functions, the position of certified court security officer shall not be considered as a hazardous duty position within the meaning of KRS

61.592

and shall not be eligible to participate in the Kentucky Law Enforcement Foundation Program Fund unless the officer meets the requirements of KRS

15.382

,

15.404

, and

15.440

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 54, § 5, effective June 26, 2007.

15.398.
Statutory provisions not superseded by KRS 15.380 to 15.404.

The following Kentucky Revised Statutes and any administrative regulations promulgated thereunder affecting those peace officers required to be certified pursuant to KRS

15.380

to

15.404

shall not be superseded by the provisions of KRS

15.380

to

15.404

, and in all instances the provisions of all statutes specified below shall prevail:

KRS Chapter 16, relating to Department of Kentucky State Police Officers;

KRS Chapter 70, relating to sheriffs, and deputy sheriffs;

KRS Chapter 78, relating to county police;

KRS Chapters 15 and 95, except for KRS

95.955

, relating to city and urban-county police;

KRS Chapter 183, relating to airport safety and security officers;

KRS Chapter 164, relating to State Universities and Colleges; Regional Education and Archaeology officers;

KRS Chapter 18A, relating to all state peace officers;

KRS

241.090

, relating to Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control investigators;

KRS

304.47-040

, relating to Division of Insurance Fraud Investigators; and

Any other statutes affecting peace officers not specifically cited herein.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 108, effective December 1, 1998; 2002, ch. 132, § 7, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 85, § 21, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 17, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 62, § 115, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2002). The Reviser of Statutes has renumbered the subsections of this statute under the authority of KRS 7.136(1)(a).

15.400.
Effect of KRS 15.380 to 15.404 on officers employed before or after December 1, 1998 — Exception to Open Records Act.

The effective date of KRS

15.380

to

15.404

shall be December 1, 1998. All peace officers employed as of December 1, 1998, shall be deemed to have met all the requirements of KRS

15.380

to

15.404

and shall be granted certified status as long as they:

Remain in continuous employment of the agency by which they were employed as of December 1, 1998, and are employed within one hundred (100) days by another law enforcement agency subject to the provisions of KRS 15.380 to 15.404;

Retired from employment with certified status on or after July 1, 2008, and are reemployed no later than one hundred (100) days from March 15, 2011, by a law enforcement agency subject to KRS 15.380 to 15.404; or

Have successfully completed an approved basic training course approved and recognized by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council pursuant to KRS 15.440(1)(d) when seeking employment with another law enforcement agency.

Any peace officers employed after December 1, 1998, shall comply with all minimum standards specified in KRS

15.380

to

15.404

or comply with the requirements set forth in KRS 15.440(1)(d)6. Persons newly employed or appointed after December 1, 1998, shall have one (1) year within which to gain certified status or they shall lose their law enforcement powers.

The Open Records Act notwithstanding, the person’s home address, telephone number, date of birth, Social Security number, background investigation, medical examination, psychological examination, and polygraph examination conducted for any person seeking certification pursuant to KRS

15.380

to

15.404

shall not be subject to disclosure.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 109, effective December 1, 1998; 2002, ch. 132, § 8, effective July 15, 2002; 2002, ch. 137, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 76, § 1, effective June 26, 2007; 2011, ch. 25, § 1, effective March 15, 2011; 2021 ch. 73, § 10, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/26/2007). The amendment to this section in 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 76, sec. 1, effective June 26, 2007, is retroactive to July 1, 2004. See 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 76, sec. 5.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A city police department did not violate the Open Records Act in denying a request to inspect all documentation and records related to the requester’s application for the position of police recruit since subsection (3) prohibits disclosure of specifically described information obtained in the application/certification process to peace officers, unsuccessful applicants who wished to become peace officers, and third parties; the prohibition is, by its own terms, mandatory, and extends not only to background investigations, but also to psychological examinations and polygraph examinations administered pursuant to subsection (2) and KRS

15.382

. OAG 00-ORD-118.

Because the confidentiality provision codified at KRS 15.400(3) does not extend by its express terms to pre-December 1, 1998, psychological examination records, and because the requester was employed in 1992, KRS 15.400(3) does not apply to psychological records in the City’s custody that relate to the requester. The requester is entitled to inspect and receive copies of her psychological records under authority of KRS 61.878(3). OAG 03-ORD-43.

15.402.
Additional requirements by employing agency.

No provisions of KRS

15.380

to

15.404

shall preclude an appointing or employing agency from having requirements that are in excess of or in addition to any requirements specified by KRS

15.380

to

15.404

or an administrative regulation promulgated under KRS 15.380 to 15.404.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 110, effective December 1, 1998; 2002, ch. 132, § 9, effective July 15, 2002.

15.404.
Basic training and in-service training for peace officers. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Any peace officers employed or appointed after December 1, 1998, who have not successfully completed basic training at a school certified or recognized by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council, shall within one (1) year of their appointment or employment, successfully complete a basic training course, as established by KRS

15.440

, at a school certified or recognized by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council or receive a basic training credit approved by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council under KRS

15.440

(1)(d)6.

In the event of extenuating circumstances beyond the control of an officer that prevent the officer from completing basic training within one (1) year, the commissioner of the department or his or her designee may grant the officer an extension of time, not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days, in which to complete the training.

Any peace officer who fails to successfully complete basic training within the specified time periods, including extensions, shall lose his or her law enforcement powers and his or her precertification status shall lapse. Further, the peace officer shall be prohibited from serving as a peace officer for a period of one (1) year from the date that his or her precertification lapses.

All peace officers with active certification status shall successfully complete forty (40) hours of annual in-service training that has been certified or recognized by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council, that is appropriate to the officer’s rank and responsibility and the size and location of his department.

In the event of extenuating circumstances beyond the control of an officer that prevent the officer from completing the in-service training within one (1) year, the commissioner of the department or his or her designee may grant the officer an extension of time, not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days, in which to complete the training. If the officer is unable to complete the in-service training due to injury or illness that prevents him or her from working as a peace officer, the one hundred eighty (180) day extension shall begin on the date that the officer returns to work.

Any peace officer who fails to successfully complete in-service training within the specified time periods, including extensions, shall lose his or her law enforcement powers and his or her certification status shall be changed to training deficiency status.

When a peace officer is deficient in required training, the commissioner of the department or his or her designee shall notify the council, which shall notify the peace officer and his or her agency.

The requirements of this subsection shall be waived for the period of time that a peace officer is serving on active duty in the United States Armed Forces.

This waiver shall be retroactive for peace officers from the date of September 11, 2001.

An officer who has lost his or her law enforcement powers due solely to his or her failure to meet the in-service training requirements of this section may regain his or her certification status and law enforcement powers upon successful completion of the training deficiency.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 480, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 132, § 10, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 139, § 6, effective June 26, 2007; 2016 ch. 112, § 1, effective July 15, 2016; 2021 ch. 73, § 11, effective June 29, 2021.

15.404.
Basic training and in-service training for peace officers and constables. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Any peace officers employed or appointed after December 1, 1998, who have not successfully completed basic training at a school certified or recognized by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council, shall within one (1) year of their appointment or employment, successfully complete a basic training course, as established by KRS

15.440

, at a school certified or recognized by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council or receive a basic training credit approved by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council under KRS

15.440

(1)(d)6.

In the event of extenuating circumstances beyond the control of an officer that prevent the officer from completing basic training within one (1) year, the commissioner of the department or his or her designee may grant the officer an extension of time, not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days, in which to complete the training.

Any peace officer who fails to successfully complete basic training within the specified time periods, including extensions, shall lose his or her law enforcement powers and his or her precertification status shall lapse. Further, the peace officer shall be prohibited from serving as a peace officer for a period of one (1) year from the date that his or her precertification lapses.

All peace officers with active certification status shall successfully complete forty (40) hours of annual in-service training that has been certified or recognized by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council, that is appropriate to the officer’s rank and responsibility and the size and location of his department.

In the event of extenuating circumstances beyond the control of an officer that prevent the officer from completing the in-service training within one (1) year, the commissioner of the department or his or her designee may grant the officer an extension of time, not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days, in which to complete the training. If the officer is unable to complete the in-service training due to injury or illness that prevents him or her from working as a peace officer, the one hundred eighty (180) day extension shall begin on the date that the officer returns to work.

Any peace officer who fails to successfully complete in-service training within the specified time periods, including extensions, shall lose his or her law enforcement powers and his or her certification status shall be changed to training deficiency status.

When a peace officer is deficient in required training, the commissioner of the department or his or her designee shall notify the council, which shall notify the peace officer and his or her agency.

The requirements of this subsection shall be waived for the period of time that a peace officer is serving on active duty in the United States Armed Forces.

This waiver shall be retroactive for peace officers from the date of September 11, 2001.

An officer who has lost his or her law enforcement powers due solely to his or her failure to meet the in-service training requirements of this section may regain his or her certification status and law enforcement powers upon successful completion of the training deficiency.

Any constable who is elected may apply for admission to a basic training course, as established by KRS

15.440

, at a school certified or recognized by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council. The constable shall meet all precertification requirements established pursuant to KRS

15.382

for attendance. The constable shall bear all costs associated with precertification. The constable shall bear all costs associated with completion of the basic training course, except the costs of basic training at a course established pursuant to KRS

15.340

.

The basic training course shall accept the constable for basic training so long as:

The constable meets the precertification requirements; and

The basic training course has the training capacity to instruct the constable.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 480, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 132, § 10, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 139, § 6, effective June 26, 2007; 2016 ch. 112, § 1, effective July 15, 2016; 2021 ch. 73, § 11, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 90, § 26, effective January 1, 2023.

15.405.
Conditional offer of employment as peace officer pending receipt of certification status and employment records.

As used in this section, “agency” means any law enforcement agency, or other unit of government listed in KRS

15.380

, that employs a certified peace officer.

Subject to subsection (5) of this section, any agency may make a conditional offer of employment to a candidate pending its receipt and evaluation of a response to its request for information from:

The council regarding the certification status of any candidate, including if the council has:

Received any notification under KRS

15.391

(4) related to the candidate;

Initiated hearing procedures under KRS

15.391

against the candidate; or

Started investigating whether to initiate hearing procedures for the revocation of the certification of the candidate under KRS 15.391; or

Any agency that previously employed the candidate for any information the agency is required to provide under subsection (3) of this section.

Any agency that receives an inquiry under subsection (2) of this section from another agency regarding a candidate for a peace officer position who was formerly employed by the agency shall provide the following documentation to the hiring agency:

A complete copy of the peace officer’s personnel file;

Any documentation related to the arrest or prosecution of the peace officer that the agency maintained;

Any documentation related to a completed internal administrative investigation of the peace officer; and

Any documentation related to an incomplete internal administrative investigation of the peace officer that was not completed because of the officer’s resignation or retirement while the investigation was pending.

The council and any agency that receives a request for information shall provide it to the requesting hiring agency no later than fourteen (14) days following the receipt of the request.

The hiring agency that elects to make a conditional offer of employment subject to its receipt and evaluation of information pursuant to this section shall require the candidate to complete a waiver and release of liability authorizing the hiring agency to request the information from all prior agencies, which may include employing agencies outside of the Commonwealth.

The council, any agency, and the employees and officers of the council or any agency shall be immune from any civil liability for disclosing information pursuant to the provisions of this section and from any civil liability for the consequences of such a disclosure unless the information disclosed was knowingly false or deliberately misleading, was rendered with malicious purpose, or was in violation of any civil right of the former employee.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 73, § 3, effective June 29, 2021.

15.406.
Council to provide certification status information to out-of-state law enforcement agency upon request.

If requested by an out-of-state law enforcement agency, the council shall provide the following information regarding the certification status of any candidate for employment, including if the council has:

Received any notification under KRS 15.391(4) related to the candidate;

Initiated hearing procedures under KRS

15.391

against the candidate; or

Started investigating whether to initiate hearing procedures for the revocation of the certification of the candidate under KRS

15.391

.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 73, § 4, effective June 29, 2021.